Idaho statutes. TITLE 34 ELECTIONS
CHAPTER 19
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS

Section.

34-1901. Number of congressional districts.

For the election of representatives in Congress, the state of Idaho is divided into two (2) congressional districts.

34-1902. First congressional district. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 79, § 11, effective July 1, 2010.

34-1903. Second congressional district. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2010, ch. 79, § 12, effective July 1, 2010.

34-1904. Residence of candidates within district. [Repealed.]